Massachusetts, session 194th, S2333.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 23A is hereby amended by adding the following new section:-
Section 69. Grants allocated to regional tourism councils through the Massachusetts
Tourism Trust Fund established in section 13T in chapter 23A shall be distributed not later than
October 1 of the fiscal year for which they are allocated.
of 1